North Carolina statutes. Chapter 59. Partnership.
Part 3. Relations of Partners to Persons Dealing with the Partnership.

§ 59-39.
Partner agent of partnership as to partnership business.

Every partner is an agent of the partnership for the purpose of its business, and the act of every partner, including the execution in the partnership name of any instrument, for apparently carrying on in the usual way the business of the partnership of which he is a member binds the partnership, unless the partner so acting has in fact no authority to act for the partnership in the particular matter, and the person with whom he is dealing has knowledge of the fact that he has no such authority.

An act of a partner which is not apparently for the carrying on of the business of the partnership in the usual way does not bind the partnership unless authorized by the other partners.

Unless authorized by the other partners or unless they have abandoned the business, one or more but less than all the partners have no authority to:

Assign the partnership property in trust for creditors, or on the assignee’s promise to pay the debts of the partnership,

Dispose of the goodwill of the business,

Do any other act which would make it impossible to carry on the ordinary business of a partnership,

Confess a judgment,

Submit a partnership claim or liability to arbitration or reference.

No act of a partner in contravention of a restriction on authority shall bind the partnership to persons having knowledge of the restriction.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 9.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Creating the Legal Monster: The Expansion and Effect of Legal Malpractice Liability in North Carolina,” see 18 Campbell L. Rev. 121 (1996).

For article, “The Creation of North Carolina’s Limited Liability Corporation Act,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 179 (1997).

§ 59-39.1.
Act, admission or acknowledgment by partner.

After a cause of action has accrued on any obligation of a partnership, any act, admission or acknowledgment by any partner acting in the ordinary course of the business of the partnership or with the authority of his copartners which removes the bar of the statute of limitations or causes the statutes to begin running anew with respect to the partner doing such act or making such admission or acknowledgment has a like effect with respect to all of the partners and with respect to partnership liability, but when any partner is not so acting and does not have the authority of his copartners, any act, admission or acknowledgment by such partner which removes the bar of the statute of limitations or causes the statute to begin running anew has such effect only as to the partner doing such act or making such admission or acknowledgment, and shall not renew, extend or in any manner impose liability of any kind against any partner who has not authorized or ratified the same nor against the partnership.

History.

1953, c. 1076, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For brief comment on this section, see 31 N.C.L. Rev. 397 (1953).

§ 59-40.
Conveyance of real property of the partnership.

Where title to real property is in the partnership name, any partner may convey title to such property by a conveyance executed in the partnership name; but the partnership may recover such property unless the partner’s act binds the partnership under the provisions of subsection (a) of

G.S. 59-39

, or unless such property has been conveyed by the grantee or a person claiming through such grantee to holder for value without knowledge that the partner, in making the conveyance, has exceeded his authority.

Where title to real property is in the name of the partnership, a conveyance executed by a partner, in his own name, passes the equitable interest of the partnership, provided the act is one within the authority of the partner under the provisions of subsection (a) of

G.S. 59-39

.

Where title to real property is in the name of one or more, but not all the partners, and the record does not disclose the right of the partnership, the partners in whose name the title stands may convey title to such property, but the partnership may recover such property if the partners’ act does not bind the partnership under the provisions of subsection (a) of

G.S. 59-39

, unless the purchaser or his assignee, is a holder for value, without knowledge.

Where the title to real property is in the name of one or more or all the partners, or in a third person in trust for the partnership, a conveyance executed by a partner in the partnership name, or in his own name, passes the equitable interest of the partnership, provided the act is one within the authority of the partner under the provisions of subsection (a) of

G.S. 59-39

.

Where the title to real property is in the names of all the partners a conveyance executed by all the partners passes all their rights in such property.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 10; 1959, c. 1161, s. 3.

§ 59-41.
Partnership bound by admission of partner.

An admission or representation made by any partner concerning partnership affairs within the scope of his authority as conferred by this Act is evidence against the partnership.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 11; 2000-140, s. 101(n).

Cross References.

As to admission after the statute of limitations has run, see

G.S. 1-27

and

G.S. 59-39.1

.

§ 59-42.
Partnership charged with knowledge of or notice to partner.

Notice to any partner of any matter relating to partnership affairs, and the knowledge of the partner acting in the particular matter, acquired while a partner or then present to his mind, and the knowledge of any other partner who reasonably could and should have communicated it to the acting partner, operate as notice to or knowledge of the partnership, except in the case of a fraud on the partnership committed by or with the consent of that partner.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 12.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1980 commercial law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1081 (1981).

For comment, “Creating the Legal Monster: The Expansion and Effect of Legal Malpractice Liability in North Carolina,” see 18 Campbell L. Rev. 121 (1996).

§ 59-43.
Partnership bound by partner’s wrongful act.

Where, by any wrongful act or omission of any partner acting in the ordinary course of the business of the partnership or with the authority of his copartners, loss or injury is caused to any person, not being a partner in the partnership, or any penalty is incurred, the partnership is liable therefor to the same extent as the partner so acting or omitting to act.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 13.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “North Carolina’s Limited Liability Company Act: A Legislative Mandate for Professional Limited Liability,” see 29 Wake Forest L. Rev. 857 (1994).

For comment, “Creating the Legal Monster: The Expansion and Effect of Legal Malpractice Liability in North Carolina,” see 18 Campbell L. Rev. 121 (1996).

§ 59-44.
Partnership bound by partner’s breach of trust.

The partnership is bound to make good the loss:

Where one partner acting within the scope of his apparent authority receives money or property of a third person and misapplies it; and

Where the partnership in the course of its business receives money or property of a third person and the money or property so received is misapplied by any partner while it is in the custody of the partnership.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 14.

§ 59-45.
Nature of partner’s liability in ordinary partnerships and in registered limited liability partnerships.

Except as provided by subsections (a1) and (b) of this section, all partners are jointly and severally liable for the acts and obligations of the partnership.

(a1)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a partner in a registered limited liability partnership is not individually liable for debts and obligations of the partnership incurred while it is a registered limited liability partnership solely by reason of being a partner and does not become liable by participating, in whatever capacity, in the management or control of the business of the partnership.

Nothing in this Chapter shall be interpreted to abolish, modify, restrict, limit, or alter the law in this State applicable to the professional relationship and liabilities between the individual furnishing the professional services and the person receiving the professional services, the standards of professional conduct applicable to the rendering of the services, or any responsibilities, obligations, or sanctions imposed under applicable licensing statutes. A partner in a registered limited liability partnership is not individually liable, directly or indirectly, including by indemnification, contribution, assessment, or otherwise, for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of, or chargeable to, the registered limited liability partnership that arise from errors, omissions, negligence, malpractice, incompetence, or malfeasance committed by another partner or by an employee, agent, or other representative of the partnership; provided, however, nothing in this Chapter shall affect the liability of a partner of a professional registered limited liability partnership for his or her own errors, omissions, negligence, malpractice, incompetence, or malfeasance committed in the rendering of professional services.

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-362, s. 5, effective October 1, 1999.

A partner in a registered limited liability partnership is not a proper party to proceedings by or against a limited liability partnership, except where the object of the proceeding is to enforce a partner’s right against or liability to the limited liability partnership.

The liability of partners of a registered limited liability partnership formed and existing under this Chapter shall at all times be determined solely and exclusively by this Chapter and the laws of this State.

If a conflict arises between the laws of this State and the laws of any other jurisdiction with regard to the liability of a partner of a registered limited liability partnership formed and existing under this Chapter for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the registered limited liability partnership, this Chapter and the laws of this State shall govern in determining the liability.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 15; 1953, c. 881; 1993, c. 354, s. 4; 1999-362, s. 5.

Cross References.

As to procedure in action against partners, see

G.S. 1-72

and

G.S. 1-113

.

As to liability of limited partner to third parties, see

G.S. 59-303

.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “North Carolina’s Limited Liability Company Act: A Legislative Mandate for Professional Limited Liability,” see 29 Wake Forest L. Rev. 857 (1994).

For comment, “Creating the Legal Monster: The Expansion and Effect of Legal Malpractice Liability in North Carolina,” see 18 Campbell L. Rev. 121 (1996).

§ 59-46.
Partner by estoppel.

When a person, by words spoken or written, by conduct, or by contract, represents himself, or consents to another representing him to anyone, as a partner in an existing partnership or with one or more persons not actual partners, he is liable to any such person to whom such representation has been made, who has, on the faith of such representation, given credit to the actual or apparent partnership, and if he has made such representation or consented to its being made in a public manner, he is liable to such person, whether the representation has or has not been made or communicated to such person so giving credit by or with the knowledge of the apparent partner making the representation or consenting to its being made.

When a partnership liability results, he is liable as though he were an actual member of the partnership.

When no partnership liability results, he is liable jointly with the other persons, if any, so consenting to the contract or representation as to incur liability, otherwise separately.

When a person has been thus represented to be a partner in an existing partnership, or with one or more persons not actual partners, he is an agent of the persons consenting to such representation to bind them to the same extent and in the same manner as though he were a partner in fact, with respect to persons who rely upon the representation. Where all the members of the existing partnership consent to the representation, a partnership act or obligation results; but in all other cases it is the joint act or obligation of the person acting and the persons consenting to the representation.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 16; 1975, c. 732.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Creating the Legal Monster: The Expansion and Effect of Legal Malpractice Liability in North Carolina,” see 18 Campbell L. Rev. 121 (1996).

§ 59-47.
Liability of incoming partner.

A person admitted as a partner into an existing partnership is liable for all the obligations of the partnership arising before his admission as though he had been a partner when such obligations were incurred, except that this liability shall be satisfied only out of partnership property.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 17.